Hyphenation/Hyphenation.Library/Resources/hyph-en-us.hyp.txt
phi-los-o-pher
phi-los-o-phers
phi-los-o-phies
pho-neme
pho-nemes
pho-ne-mic
phos-phor-ic
pho-to-graphs
pho-to-off-set
phys-ics
pic-a-dor
pic-a-dors
pipe-line
pipe-lines
pipe-lin-ing
pi-ra-nhas
placa-ble
plant-hop-per
plant-hop-pers
pla-teau
pla-teaus
pleas-ance
plug-in
plug-ins
pluri-sub-har-monic
pol-ter-geist
poly-an-dry
poly-an-drous
poly-dac-tyl
poly-dac-tyl-lic
po-lyg-a-mist
po-lyg-a-mists
polyg-on-i-za-tion
po-lyg-y-ny
po-lyg-y-nous
po-lyn-ya
po-lyn-yas
pol-yp
pol-yps
po-lyph-o-ny
po-lyph-o-nous
poly-phon-ic
poly-se-my
pome-gran-ate
pome-gran-ates
poro-elas-tic
por-ous
por-ta-ble
post-am-ble
post-am-bles
post-hu-mous
post-script
post-scripts
pos-tur-al
po-ta-ble
po-ta-to
po-ta-toes
pre-am-ble
pre-am-bles
pre-dict-able
predi-lec-tion
predi-lec-tions
pre-fers
pre-loaded
prem-ise
prem-ises
pre-par-ing
pre-pend
pre-pends
pre-pend-ed
pre-pend-ing
prep-o-si-tion
prep-o-si-tions
prep-o-si-tional
pre-print
pre-prints
pre-proces-sor
pre-proces-sors
pres-ent-ly
pre-split-ting
pre-wrap
pre-wrapped
priest-esses
pret-ty-prin-ter
pret-ty-prin-ting
pro-ce-dur-al
process
pro-cur-ance
prog-e-nies
prog-e-ny
pro-gram-mable
pro-kary-ote
pro-kary-otes
pro-kary-ot-ic
prom-i-nent
pro-mis-cu-ous
prom-is-sory
prom-ise
prom-ises
pro-pel-ler
pro-pel-lers
pro-pel-ling
pro-hib-i-tive
pro-hib-i-tive-ly
pro-sciut-to
pros-ta-glan-din
pros-ta-glan-dins
pro-style
pro-styles
pro-test-er
pro-test-ers
pro-tes-tor
pro-tes-tors
pro-to-lan-guage
pro-to-typ-al
pro-vi-der
pro-vi-ders
prov-ince
prov-inces
pro-vin-cial
pro-virus
pro-viruses
prow-ess
pseu-do-dif-fer-en-tial
pseu-do-fi-nite
pseu-do-fi-nite-ly
pseu-do-forces
pseu-dog-ra-pher
pseu-do-group
pseu-do-groups
pseu-do-num-ber
pseu-do-num-bers
pseu-do-nym
pseu-do-nyms
pseu-do-word
pseu-do-words
psy-che-del-ic
psychs
pu-bes-cence
pur-ges
quad-ding
qua-drat-ic
qua-drat-ics
quad-ra-ture
quad-ri-lat-er-al
quad-ri-lat-er-als
quad-ri-pleg-ic
quad-ru-ped
quad-ru-peds
quad-ru-pole
quad-ru-poles
quaint-er
quaint-est
qua-si-equiv-a-lence
qua-si-equiv-a-lences
qua-si-equiv-a-lent
qua-si-hy-po-nor-mal
qua-si-rad-i-cal
qua-si-resid-ual
qua-si-smooth
qua-si-sta-tion-ary
qua-si-topos
qua-si-tri-an-gu-lar
qua-si-triv-ial
quin-tes-sence
quin-tes-sences
quin-tes-sen-tial
QWERTY
rab-bit-ry
ra-di-og-ra-phy
raff-ish
raff-ish-ly
rag-ged
ram-shackle
rav-en-ous
re-allo-cate
re-allo-cates
re-allo-cated
re-arrange
re-arranges
re-arranged
re-arrange-ment
re-arrange-ments
rec-i-proc-i-ties
rec-i-proc-i-ty
rec-tan-gle
rec-tan-gles
rec-tan-gu-lar
re-di-rect
re-di-rect-ion
re-duc-ible
re-echo
re-edu-cate
ref-u-gee
ref-u-gees
re-imple-ment
re-imple-ments
re-imple-mented
re-imple-men-ta-tion
ren-ais-sance
re-phrase
re-phrases
re-phrased
re-po-si-tion
re-po-si-tions
re-print
re-prints
re-print-ed
re-stor-able
retro-fit
retro-fit-ted
re-us-able
re-use
re-wire
re-wrap
re-wrapped
re-write
rhi-noc-er-os
right-eous
right-eous-ness
ring-leader
ring-leaders
ro-bot
ro-bots
ro-botic
ro-bot-ics
roof-top
roof-tops
round-ish
round-ish-ness
round-table
round-tables
run-nable
sales-clerk
sales-clerks
sales-woman
sales-women
sa-lient
sal-mo-nel-la
sal-ta-tion
sar-sa-par-il-la
sat-el-lite
sat-el-lites
sauer-kraut
sca-lar
sca-lars
scat-o-log-i-cal
scene-shift-er
scene-shift-ing
sched-ul-ing
schiz-o-phrenic
schnau-zer
school-child
school-child-ren
school-teacher
school-teach-ers
scru-ti-ny
scyth-ing
sell-er
sell-ers
sec-re-tar-iat
sec-re-tar-iats
sem-a-phore
sem-a-phores
se-mes-ter
semi-def-i-nite
semi-di-rect
semi-ho-mo-thet-ic
semi-ring
semi-rings
semi-sim-ple
semi-skilled
semi-sta-ble
sem-itic
ser-geant
ser-geants
sero-epi-de-mi-o-log-i-cal
ser-vo-me-chan-i-cal
ser-vo-mech-a-nism
ser-vo-mech-a-nisms
ses-qui-pe-da-lian
set-up
set-ups
se-vere-ly
shap-able
shape-able
shoe-string
shoe-strings
shop-lift-er
shop-lift-ing
show-hy-phens
side-step
side-steps
side-swipe
sign-age
single-space
single-spaced
single-spacing
SI-units
sky-scraper
sky-scrapers
sln-uni-code
smoke-stack
smoke-stacks
snor-kel-ing
so-le-noid
so-le-noids
solute
solutes
sov-er-eign
sov-er-eigns
spa-ces
spe-cious
spec-tros-co-py
spell-er
spell-ers
spell-ing
spe-lunk-er
spend-thrift
spher-oid
spher-oids
spher-oid-al
sphin-ges
spic-i-ly
spin-or
spin-ors
spokes-man
spokes-men
spokes-per-son
spokes-per-sons
spokes-woman
spokes-women
sports-cast
sports-cast-er
spor-tive-ly
sports-wear
sports-writer
sports-writers
spright-lier
squea-mish
stand-alone
star-tling
star-tling-ly
sta-tis-tics
stealth-ily
steeple-chase
stereo-graph-ic
ste-ril-i-ty
sto-chas-tic
stop-list
stop-lists
strange-ness
strap-hanger
strat-a-gem
strat-a-gems
stretch-abil-ity
stretch-i-er
strip-tease
strong-est
strong-hold
stu-pid-er
stu-pid-est
style-sheet
style-sheets
sub-dif-fer-en-tial
sub-ex-pres-sion
sub-ex-pres-sions
sub-node
sub-nodes
sub-scrib-er
sub-scrib-ers
sub-se-lect
sub-se-lects
sub-se-lected
sub-se-lec-tion
sub-se-lec-tions
sub-tables
sum-ma-ble
super-deri-va-tion
super-deri-va-tions
super-ego
super-egos
super-el-lipse
super-el-lipses
super-ellip-ti-cal
super-ellip-ti-cally
super-ellip-ti-cal-ness
su-pra-ordi-nate
su-prem-a-cist
su-prem-a-cists
sur-gery
sur-ger-ies
sur-ges
sur-veil-lance
swim-ming-ly
symp-to-matic
syn-chro-ni-city
syn-chro-mesh
syn-chro-nous
syn-chro-tron
syn-o-nym
syn-o-nyms
syn-on-y-mous
syn-on-y-my
tab-leau
tab-leaux
taff-rail
take-over
take-overs
talk-a-tive
ta-pes-try
ta-pes-tries
tar-pau-lin
tar-pau-lins
te-leg-ra-pher
te-leg-ra-phers
tele-ki-net-ic
tele-ki-net-ics
tele-ro-bot-ics
tell-er
tell-ers
tem-po-rar-ily
ten-ure
test-bed
tera-nodes
text-height
text-length
text-width
thal-a-mus
ther-mal
ther-mo-elas-tic
ther-mo-elas-tic-ity
ther-mom-eter
ther-mom-eters
ther-mo-nu-clear
thesis
theses
ti-ger
ti-gers
time-stamp
time-stamps
ti-ta-nate
tool-kit
tool-kits
topo-graph-i-cal
topo-iso-mer-ase
topo-iso-mer-ases
toques
trac-ta-ble
trai-tor-ous
trans-at-lan-tic
trans-ceiver
trans-ceivers
tran-sept
tran-septs
trans-gress
trans-pacific
trans-par-en-cy
trans-par-en-cies
trans-pile
trans-piles
trans-piled
trans-pi-ler
trans-pi-lers
trans-pil-ing
trans-ver-sal
trans-ver-sals
trans-ves-tite
trans-ves-tites
tra-pe-zium
trap-e-zoid
trap-e-zoids
trap-e-zoi-dal
tra-vers-a-ble
tra-ver-sal
tra-ver-sals
treach-eries
tribes-man
trig-o-no-met-ric
trig-o-nom-e-try
trip-let
trip-lets
tri-plex
tri-plex-es
trou-ba-dour
tur-key
tur-keys
turn-around
turn-arounds
typ-al
uber-mensch
un-at-tached
un-err-ing-ly
un-friend-ly
un-friend-li-er
un-in-stan-ti-at-ed
un-pre-dict-a-ble
un-pre-dict-a-bly
vaguer
vaude-ville
vic-ars
vil-lain-ess
vis-ual
vis-ual-ly
vi-vip-a-rous
voice-print
vspace
wad-ding
wall-flower
wall-flow-ers
warm-er
warm-est
waste-water
wave-guide
wave-guides
wave-let
wave-lets
weap-ons
weap-on-ry
web-like
web-log
web-logs
week-night
week-nights
weight-lift-er
weight-lift-ing
wheel-chair
wheel-chairs
which-ever
white-sided
white-space
white-spaces
wide-spread
wing-span
wing-spans
wing-spread
witch-craft
word-spac-ing
work-around
work-arounds
work-horse
work-horses
wrap-around
wrap-arounds
wretch-ed
wretch-ed-ly
yes-ter-year
Alex-an-der
Alex-an-dria
Alex-an-drine
al-ge-brai-sche
Al-gon-quian
Al-gon-quin
Al-le-ghe-ny
An-da-lu-cia
An-da-lu-cian
An-da-lu-sia
An-da-lu-sian
Apol-lo-dorus
Arbor-Text
Ar-kan-sas
Ath-ens
Auf-lage
Aus-tral-asian
auto-ma-ti-sier-ter
Beb-chuk
Be-die-nung
Bembo
bi-blio-gra-phi-sche
Big-elow
Bos-ton
Bow-ditch
Bring-hurst
Brink-mann
Brown-ian
Bruns-wick
Bu-da-pest
Burck-hardt
Can-a-da
Ca-na-di-an
Cara-theo-dory
Car-ib-bean
Car-ne-gie
Charles-ton
Char-lottes-ville
Ches-ter
Chiang
Chi-ca-go
Chich-es-ter
Cohen
Co-lum-bi-an
Co-lum-bia
com-pa-rai-son
Czecho-slo-va-kia
Del-a-ware
Dijk-stra
Dor-ches-ter
Dorf-leit-ner
Drechs-ler
Duane
dy-na-mi-sche
Eijk-hout
Engle
Engel
Eng-lish
Euler-ian
Evan-ston
Feb-ru-ary
Fest-schrift
Flor-i-da
Flor-i-d-ian
For-schungs-in-sti-tut
Frank-lin
Free-BSD
funk-tsional
Gauss-ian
Geof-frey
Geo-gebra
Ge-sell-schaft
Ghost-script
Ghost-View
Gott-fried
Gott-lieb
Gran-jon
Grass-mann-ian
Greifs-wald
Grothen-dieck
Grund-leh-ren
Ha-da-mard
Hai-fa
Ham-il-ton
Ham-il-to-nian
Hara-lam-bous
Has-kell
Hed-rick
Hegel-ian
Hel-sinki
Her-mit-ian
Hew-lett
Hibbs
Hil-bert
Hoef-ler
Hoek-water
Hok-kai-do
Huber
Image-Magick
Jac-kow-ski
Jan-u-ary
Ja-pa-nese
Java-Script
Je-re-miah
Jo-seph
Jung-ian
Kad-om-tsev
Kan-sas
Karls-ruhe
Keynes-ian
Knuth-ian
Kor-te-weg
Krishna
Krish-na-ism
Krish-nan
Kron-ecker
Kunst-aka-de-mie
Lan-cas-ter
La-place
Le-gendre
Leices-ter
Les-ter
Lip-schitz
Lip-schitz-ian
Loj-ban
Lou-i-si-ana
Lucas
MacBeth
Mac-OS
Ma-gel-lan
Mal-a-ya-lam
Man-ches-ter
Mar-kov-ian
Markt-ober-dorf
Mass-a-chu-setts
Max-i-mil-ian
Max-well
Mes-o-po-ta-mia
Mes-o-po-ta-mian
Meth-od-ist
Meth-od-ism
Mi-cro-soft
Min-kow-ski
Min-ne-ap-o-lis
Min-ne-sota
Moj-ca
Mon-aco
Mon-ta-gnard
Mon-ta-gnards
Mont-real
Mora-wetz
Mor-dell
Mos-cow
Nach-rich-ten
Nash-ville
Net-BSD
Net-scape
Nich-o-las
Nietz-sche
Nij-me-gen
Noe-ther-ian
Noord-wijker-hout
North-amp-ton
Noto-wi-digdo
No-vem-ber
Obst-feld
Open-BSD
Open-Office
Oreo-pou-los
Pack-ard
Paki-stan
Pala-tino
Pa-ler-mo
Pe-trov-ski
Phin-eas
Pfaff-ian
Phil-a-del-phia
phi-lo-so-phi-sche
Por-tu-guese
Poin-care
Po-ten-tial-glei-chung
Po-to-mac
Pres-by-terian
Pres-by-terians
Pyong-yang
Py-thag-o-ras
Py-thag-o-re-an
Ra-dha-krish-nan
raths-kel-ler
Ravi-kumar
Reich-lin
Rich-ard
Rie-mann-ian
Robes-pierre
Ro-ches-ter
Ryd-berg
Schim-mel-pfen-nig
Scholar-TeX
schot-ti-sche
Schro-din-ger
Schwa-ba-cher
Schwarz-schild
Schweid-nitz
Schwert
Sep-tem-ber
Shore-ditch
Singa-pore
Singa-po-re-an
Singa-po-re-ans
Skoup
South-amp-ton
Stokes-sche
Stutt-gart
Sus-que-han-na
Syl-ves-ter
Tau-ber-ian
tech-ni-sche
Ten-nes-see
Thiruv-ananda-puram
Tol-ches-ter
To-ma-szew-ski
To-Unicode
Toyo-ta
ty-po-graphique
Ukrain-ian
Ven-e-zu-e-la
Ven-e-zu-e-lan
ver-all-ge-mei-nerte
Ver-ei-ni-gung
Ver-tei-lun-gen
Vid-ias-sov
Vieth
viiith
viith
Wahr-schein-lich-keits-theo-rie
Wein-stein
Werk-zeuge
Wer-ner
Wer-ther-ian
Wiki-pe-dia
Wil-czyn-ski
Will-iam
Will-iams
Win-ches-ter
Wing-dings
Wirt-schaft
wis-sen-schaft-lich
Wolff-ian
Wolfs-kehl
Wood-row
Xerox
xiiith
xviiith
xviith
xxiiird
xxiind
Ying-yong Shu-xue Ji-suan
Zea-land
Zeit-schrift
acryl-amide
acryl-amides
acryl-alde-hyde
am-phet-a-mine
am-phet-a-mines
ATP-ase
ATP-ases
cor-ti-co-steroid
di-chloro-meth-ane
eth-ane
eth-yl-am-ine
eth-yl-ate
eth-yl-ated
eth-yl-ene
ethy-nyl
ethy-nyl-a-tion
fluoro-car-bon
meth-am-phet-a-mine
meth-ane
meth-yl-am-mo-nium
meth-yl-ate
meth-yl-ated
meth-yl-a-tion
meth-yl-ene
nitro-meth-ane
nor-ep-i-neph-rine
ortho-nitro-toluene
para-di-methyl-benzene
para-fluoro-toluene
para-methyl-anisole
phe-nol-phthalein
phenyl-ala-nine
phtha-lam-ic
phthal-ate
phthi-sis
poly-ene
poly-ethy-lene
poly-pep-tide
poly-pep-tides
poly-styrene
poly-vinyl
tetra-butyl-ammo-nium
tri-ethyl-amine
